Maine, session 132, LD1175.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 4 MRSA §1802, sub-§4, ¶B-1 is enacted to read:
B-1. An indigent party or minor child in a civil case in which federal or state law gives
the court discretion to provide representation for that indigent party or minor child;
Sec. 2. 18-C MRSA §5-205, sub-§4, as enacted by PL 2017, c. 402, Pt. A, §2 and
affected by PL 2019, c. 417, Pt. B, §14, is amended to read:
4. Appointment of counsel. A nonconsenting parent whose parental rights have not
been terminated is entitled to court-appointed legal counsel if indigent. In a contested
action, the court may also appoint counsel for any indigent guardian or petitioner when a
parent or legal custodian has counsel. The Maine Commission on Public Defense Services
under Title 4, section 1801 shall pay for the reasonable costs and expenses of an attorney
appointed under this subsection.
Sec. 3. 18-C MRSA §5-205, sub-§5, as enacted by PL 2017, c. 402, Pt. A, §2 and
affected by PL 2019, c. 417, Pt. B, §14, is amended to read:
5. Attorney for a minor; notice to minor. If the court determines at any stage of the
proceeding, before or after appointment, that the interests of the minor are or may be
inadequately represented, the court may appoint an attorney to represent the minor, giving
consideration to the choice of the minor if the minor has attained 14 years of age. The
Maine Commission on Public Defense Services under Title 4, section 1801 shall pay for
the reasonable costs and expenses of an attorney appointed under this subsection. A minor
may appear with or through counsel, but the court is not restricted from requiring the minor
to be present for some or all of a hearing or other proceeding. A minor 14 years of age or
older must receive notice of any proceeding subsequent to the appointment of a guardian
through the same means as required for any other party, and the minor may consent, object
or otherwise participate in the proceeding.
Sec. 4. 18-C MRSA §9-106, sub-§1, as enacted by PL 2017, c. 402, Pt. A, §2 and
affected by PL 2019, c. 417, Pt. B, §14, is amended to read:
1. Attorney for parents. The parents are entitled to an attorney for any hearing held
pursuant to this Article. If a parent or putative parent wants an attorney but is unable to
afford one, the parent or the putative parent may request the court to appoint an attorney.
If the court finds the requesting party indigent, the court shall appoint and pay the
reasonable costs and expenses of the an attorney of for the indigent party. The attorney
may not be the attorney for the adoptive parents. The Maine Commission on Public Defense
Services under Title 4, section 1801 shall pay for the reasonable costs and expenses of an
attorney appointed under this subsection.
Sec. 5. 18-C MRSA §9-106, sub-§2, as enacted by PL 2017, c. 402, Pt. A, §2 and
affected by PL 2019, c. 417, Pt. B, §14, is amended to read:
2. Attorney for minor indigent parent. When the adoptee is unrelated to the
petitioner, the court shall appoint an attorney who is not the attorney for the adoptive
parents to represent a minor indigent parent at every stage of the proceedings unless the
minor indigent parent refuses representation or the court determines that representation is
unnecessary. The Maine Commission on Public Defense Services under Title 4, section
Page 1 - 132LR0526(01)

413 1801 shall pay for the reasonable costs and expenses of an attorney appointed under this
424 subsection.
Sec. 6. 19-A MRSA §1658, sub-§2-A, ¶A, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 340, §2, is
amended to read:
A. The court shall appoint an attorney for a parent who is the subject of a petition to
terminate parental rights and responsibilities under this section and who is indigent. In
a contested action, the court may also appoint counsel for any indigent petitioner who
files a petition under this section when the parent who is the subject of the petition is
represented by counsel. The Maine Commission on Public Defense Services under
Title 4, section 1801 shall pay for the reasonable costs and expenses of an attorney
appointed under this section.
Sec. 7. 22 MRSA §4005, sub-§1, ¶F, as amended by PL 1995, c. 405, §20, is
further amended to read:
F. The guardian ad litem or the child may request the court to appoint legal counsel
for the child. The District Court Maine Commission on Public Defense Services under
Title 4, section 1801 shall pay reasonable costs and expenses of the child's legal
counsel.